Maryland, session 2025, HB0531.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–140.
(A) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(2) (I) “DISABILITY” MEANS A PHYSICAL OR MENTAL CONDITION
THAT IMPEDES REGULAR, IN–PERSON ATTENDANCE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0531*

HOUSE BILL 531
(II) “DISABILITY” INCLUDES:
1. CHRONIC ILLNESS; AND
2. AUTOIMMUNE CONDITIONS.
(3) “ELIGIBLE STUDENT” MEANS A STUDENT WITH A DISABILITY WHO
HAS DOCUMENTATION FROM A LICENSED HEALTH CARE PROVIDER THAT THE
STUDENT NEEDS ACCOMMODATIONS FOR THE DISABILITY.
(4) “REMOTE LEARNING” MEANS EDUCATIONAL INSTRUCTION THAT
IS DELIVERED ONLINE OR THROUGH DIGITAL METHODS THAT ALLOW A STUDENT TO
ACCESS COURSES FROM AN OFF–CAMPUS LOCATION.
(B) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION,
BEGINNING IN THE 2026–2027 ACADEMIC YEAR, ALL PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF
HIGHER EDUCATION IN THE STATE SHALL ESTABLISH REMOTE LEARNING
ACCOMMODATIONS FOR ELIGIBLE STUDENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
(2) REMOTE LEARNING ACCOMMODATIONS INCLUDE:
(I) LIVESTREAMED CLASSES;
(II) RECORDED CLASSES;
(III) VIRTUAL OFFICE HOURS; AND
(IV) REMOTE ACCESS TO ACADEMIC RESOURCES.
(3) PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION HAVE DISCRETION
AS TO THE SPECIFIC SOFTWARE PLATFORMS USED TO PROVIDE REMOTE LEARNING
ACCOMMODATIONS.
(4) EACH YEAR PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION SHALL
SURVEY ELIGIBLE STUDENTS ON THE EFFECTIVENESS OF THE REMOTE LEARNING
ACCOMMODATIONS AND WHETHER THE ELIGIBLE STUDENTS ARE SATISFIED.
(C) (1) ON APPLICATION FROM A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, THE COMMISSION MAY ISSUE A WAIVER FROM THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION IN THE FOLLOWING CIRCUMSTANCES:

HOUSE BILL 531 3
(I) FINANCIAL HARDSHIP AS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF
THIS SUBSECTION;
(II) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS
LOCATED IN A RURAL AREA AS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION;
AND
(III) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS
NEWLY ESTABLISHED AS DESCRIBED IN PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION WITH AN ANNUAL
OPERATING BUDGET UNDER $5,000,000 MAY APPLY FOR A WAIVER IF THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION WILL IMPOSE A FINANCIAL STRAIN ON THE
INSTITUTION.
(3) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS LOCATED
IN A RURAL AREA WITH LIMITED ACCESS TO RELIABLE HIGH–SPEED INTERNET MAY
APPLY FOR A WAIVER.
(4) A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT IS NEWLY
ESTABLISHED OR IS IN THE PROCESS OF TRANSITIONING TO A REMOTE–FRIENDLY
INFRASTRUCTURE MAY APPLY FOR A WAIVER.
(5) (I) THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH ANY NECESSARY
PROCEDURES AND DEADLINES FOR THE SUBMISSION, EVALUATION, AND APPROVAL
OF WAIVER REQUESTS.
(II) THE COMMISSION MAY APPROVE A WAIVER REQUEST IN
WHOLE OR IN PART.
(III) A WAIVER REQUEST UNDER PARAGRAPH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION MAY BE APPROVED FOR UP TO 2 YEARS SUBJECT TO PERIODIC
PROGRESS REVIEW BY THE COMMISSION.
(D) (1) A GRANT IS AVAILABLE TO A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION TO ASSIST THE INSTITUTION TO COMPLY WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION.
(2) (I) TO RECEIVE A GRANT, A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION SHALL APPLY TO THE COMMISSION.
(II) THE APPLICATION SHALL BE ON A FORM MADE AVAILABLE
BY THE COMMISSION AND SHALL INCLUDE:

HOUSE BILL 531
1. DETAILED PLANS FOR IMPLEMENTING THE
REQUIREMENTS OF THIS SECTION;
2. AN ITEMIZATION OF PROJECTED COSTS FOR
IMPLEMENTATION, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE OF TECHNOLOGY, TRAINING, AND
ANY OTHER INFRASTRUCTURE COSTS;
3. THE MEASURES THAT WILL BE USED TO ENSURE
QUALITY AND ACCESSIBILITY FOR EACH ELIGIBLE STUDENT; AND
4. DETAILED PLANS FOR ENSURING THAT MOST DEGREE
PROGRAMS CAN BE COMPLETED REMOTELY.
(3) THE COMMISSION MAY ESTABLISH ANY NECESSARY PROCEDURES
AND DEADLINES FOR THE SUBMISSION, EVALUATION, AND APPROVAL OF GRANT
APPLICATIONS.
(4) GRANTS MAY BE USED ONLY FOR THE FOLLOWING EXPENSES:
(I) THE PURCHASE OF TECHNOLOGY AND DIGITAL RESOURCES
FOR REMOTE INSTRUCTION, INCLUDING THE PURCHASE OF NECESSARY UPGRADES;
AND
(II) THE TRAINING OF FACULTY AND STAFF TO DELIVER
HIGH–QUALITY REMOTE LEARNING ACCOMMODATIONS.
(5) ON OR BEFORE AUGUST 1, 2027, AND EACH AUGUST 1
THEREAFTER, GRANT RECIPIENTS SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE COMMISSION
THAT PROVIDES DETAILED INFORMATION ON THE EXPENDITURE OF FUNDS
RECEIVED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(E) (1) EVERY 6 MONTHS, THE COMMISSION SHALL REVIEW THE
PROGRESS MADE BY PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION IN BECOMING
COMPLIANT WITH THIS SECTION TO ENSURE THAT THE MAJORITY OF ACADEMIC
MAJORS AND DEGREES PROVIDE REMOTE LEARNING ACCOMMODATIONS TO ALL
ELIGIBLE STUDENTS BY AUGUST 1, 2029.
(2) IF A PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION IS NOT
PROVIDING REMOTE LEARNING ACCOMMODATIONS TO ALL ELIGIBLE STUDENTS BY
AUGUST 1, 2029, THE COMMISSION MAY DEEM THE INSTITUTION AS
NONCOMPLIANT.

HOUSE BILL 531 5
(3) FOR A NONCOMPLIANT PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER
EDUCATION, THE COMMISSION MAY REDUCE THE APPROPRIATION OF STATE FUNDS
TO THAT INSTITUTION.
(4) THE COMMISSION SHALL ESTABLISH AN APPEAL PROCESS FOR
PUBLIC INSTITUTIONS OF HIGHER EDUCATION TO APPEAL THE DETERMINATION OF
NONCOMPLIANCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION.
(F) (1) ON OR BEFORE JULY 1, 2027, AND EACH JULY 1 THEREAFTER, A
PUBLIC INSTITUTION OF HIGHER EDUCATION THAT WAS NOT ISSUED A WAIVER
UNDER SUBSECTION (C) OF THIS SECTION SHALL SUBMIT A REPORT TO THE
COMMISSION.
(2) THE REPORT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) EVIDENCE OF COMPLIANCE WITH THE REQUIREMENTS OF
THIS SECTION;
(II) THE NUMBER OF ELIGIBLE STUDENTS SERVED;
(III) THE TYPES OF REMOTE LEARNING ACCOMMODATIONS
PROVIDED; AND
(IV) EFFORTS MADE TO IMPROVE ACCESSIBILITY AND
OUTCOMES FOR ELIGIBLE STUDENTS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.